Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.332

Motor-driven cycle.

"Motor-driven cycle" means every motorcycle, including every motor scooter, with a motor that produces not to exceed five brake horsepower (developed by a prime mover, as measured by a brake applied to the driving shaft). A motor-driven cycle does not include a moped, a power wheelchair, a motorized foot scooter, or an electric personal assistive mobility device.

[ 2003 c 353 s 7; 2003 c 141 s 4; 2002 c 247 s 4; 1979 ex.s. c 213 s 3; 1963 c 154 s 28.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2003 c 141 s 4 and by 2003 c 353 s 7, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—2003 c 353: See note following RCW 46.04.320.

Legislative review—2002 c 247: See note following RCW 46.04.1695.

Effective date—1963 c 154: See note following RCW 46.37.010.